Mississippi statutes. Title 89. Real and Personal Property
Chapter 12. Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act
§ 89-12-39.
Claim for abandoned property paid or delivered to treasurer; determination; interest.

Any person claiming an interest in any property delivered to the state under the provisions of this chapter may file a claim on the form prescribed by the Treasurer.

The Treasurer shall consider any claim filed under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, and may hold a hearing and receive evidence concerning it. If a hearing is held, he shall prepare a finding and a decision in writing on each claim filed, stating the substance of any evidence heard by him and the reasons for his decision. The decision shall be a public record.

If the validity of a claim shall be determined in favor of the claimant, the Treasurer shall pay over to the claimant only that amount which the Treasurer actually received, without deduction for costs of notices or for service charges, together with interest at the rate of one-twelfth of one percent (1/12 of 1%) per month from the time when it was received by the Treasurer to the time when it was paid by him to the claimant. However, if the property claimed was interest bearing to the owner on the date of surrender by the holder, then the Treasurer shall instead add interest at a rate not to exceed five-twelfths of one percent (5/12 of 1%) per month or the lesser current market rate. The interest on interest-bearing property shall begin to accumulate on the date that the property is delivered to the Treasurer and shall cease on the earlier of the expiration of fifteen (15) years following delivery or the date on which payment is made to the owner. No interest on the interest-bearing property shall be payable for any period prior to July 1, 1982. Any holder who pays to the owner property which has been delivered to the state and which, if claimed from the Treasurer, would be subject to the provisions of this section as interest-bearing property, shall add interest as provided in this section. The added interest shall be repaid to the holder by the Treasurer in the same manner as the principal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 497, § 20; Laws, 1993, ch. 460, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 89-12-41.
Judicial review of action of treasurer upon claim.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the treasurer or as to whose claim the treasurer has failed to act within ninety (90) days after the filing of the claim, may commence an action in the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, to establish his claim. The proceeding shall be brought within thirty (30) days after the decision of the treasurer or within sixty (60) days from the filing of the claim if the treasurer fails to act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 497, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 89-12-43.
Treasurer may decline to receive property presumed abandoned.

The treasurer, after receiving reports of property deemed abandoned pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, may decline to receive any property reported which he deems to have a value less than the cost of giving notice, or he may, if he deems it desirable because of the small sum involved, postpone taking possession until a sufficient sum accumulates. Unless the holder of the property is notified to the contrary within thirty (30) days after filing the report required under Section 89-12-23, the treasurer shall be deemed to have elected to receive the custody of the property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 497, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 89-12-45.
Examination of records by treasurer or designated regulatory authority.

The Treasurer may at reasonable times and upon reasonable notice examine the records of any person to determine if such person has complied with the provisions of this chapter. The Treasurer may designate the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance or other appropriate regulatory authority to examine the records of institutions of regulated industries to determine if such institutions have complied with the provisions of this chapter.

If, in connection with such examination, property which should have been reported pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is discovered, the holder shall pay a per diem rate equal to actual costs per examination as the cost of conducting the examination.

If any person refuses to permit the examination provided in this section or to deliver property to the Treasurer as required under the provisions of this chapter, the Treasurer shall bring an action in a court of appropriate jurisdiction to compel such examination or to enforce such delivery.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 497, § 23; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 161, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 89-12-47.
Penalties for failure to make reports or to pay or deliver abandoned property.

Any person who willfully fails to render any report or perform other duties required under the provisions of this chapter shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of Five Dollars ($5.00) for each day the report is withheld, but not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

Any person who willfully refuses to pay or deliver abandoned property to the Treasurer as required under the provisions of this chapter shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than Five Dollars ($5.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, in the discretion of the court.

In addition to any damages, penalties, or fines for which a person may be liable under any other provision of law, any person who fails to report, pay or deliver abandoned property within the time prescribed by the provisions of this chapter shall pay to the Treasurer interest at the rate of one percent (1%) per month on the property or the value thereof from the date the property should have been paid or delivered, but in no event prior to July 1, 1982; except that if the failure to report, pay or deliver is the result of mistake or other good cause shown, the Treasurer may reduce the rate of interest or waive the interest payable thereon.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 497, § 24; Laws, 1993, ch. 460, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 89-12-49.
Rules and regulations.

The treasurer is hereby authorized to adopt necessary rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 497, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 89-12-51.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 408, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

[Laws, 1982, ch. 497, § 27; Laws 1985, ch. 403, § 2]

§ 89-12-53.
Chapter inapplicable to property of minor or incompetent.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any person who is the owner of any type of property described herein where such person is either a minor or mentally incompetent, nor to any person who is the owner of any type of property described herein which is subject to the provisions of Section 43-13-120.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 497, § 27; Laws, 1985, ch. 403, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1985).

§ 89-12-55.
Uniformity of interpretation.

This chapter shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 497, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 89-12-57.
Provisions of chapter supplemental to Section 21-39-21.

This chapter shall not be construed as repealing the provisions of Section 21-39-21, but shall be additional and supplemental to those provisions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 497, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 89-12-59.
Certain unclaimed United States savings bonds escheat to state; procedures.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of law, United States savings bonds which are unclaimed property and subject to the provisions of this chapter shall escheat to the State of Mississippi three (3) years after becoming unclaimed property by virtue of the provisions of this chapter, and all property rights and legal title to and ownership of such United States savings bonds or proceeds from such bonds, including all rights, powers and privileges of survivorship of any owner, co-owner or beneficiary, shall vest solely in the State of Mississippi according to the procedure set forth in subsections (2) through (5) of this section.

Within one hundred eighty (180) days after the three (3) years prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, if no claim has been filed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter for such United States savings bonds, the State Treasurer shall commence a civil action in the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County for a determination that such United States savings bonds shall escheat to the State of Mississippi. The State Treasurer may postpone the bringing of such action until sufficient United States savings bonds have accumulated in the State Treasurer custody to justify the expense of such proceedings.

If no person shall file a claim or appear at the hearing to substantiate a claim or where the court determines that a claimant is not entitled to the property claimed by such claimant, then the court, if satisfied by evidence that the State Treasurer has substantially complied with the laws of the State of Mississippi, shall enter a judgment that the subject United States savings bonds have escheated to the State of Mississippi, and all property rights and legal title to and ownership of such United States savings bonds or proceeds from such bonds, including all rights, powers and privileges of survivorship of any owner, co-owner or beneficiary, shall vest solely in the State of Mississippi.

The State Treasurer shall redeem such United States savings bonds escheated to the State of Mississippi and the proceeds from such redemption of United States savings bonds shall be deposited in the State General Fund. The State Treasurer shall not deposit the proceeds from the redemption of the United States savings bonds in the Abandoned Property Fund or the Abandoned Property Claims Payment Fund in accordance with the provisions of Section 89-12-37.

Any person making a claim for the United States savings bonds escheated to the State of Mississippi under this subsection, or for the proceeds from such bonds, may file a claim in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Upon providing sufficient proof of the validity of such person’s claim, the State Treasurer may pay such claim in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 431, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2014.